07_Project/apertium.fub.fub.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Adamawa Fulfulde

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
## Example inflection pattern:
# NounRoot RegNounInfl
Number
Punctuation


## Example inflection lexicon:
# LEXICON RegNounInfl
# <n><sg>:
# <n><pl>:>s


###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

## Example stem lexicon:
# LEXICON NounRoot
# house:house   # A noun


PATTERN Number
Numeral [<num>:]

LEXICON Numeral
/([0123456789])+/
/([0123456789])+[.,]([0123456789])+/

LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:? 
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst

PATTERNS
VerbRoot VerbInfl? Counterfactual?
VerbRoot :VerbInfix VerbInfl VerbInfix:
AuxiliaryRoot
AuxiliaryRoot AuxiliaryInfl
Noun_ɗam
Noun_ka
Noun_ki
Noun_ko
Noun_nde
Noun_ndi
Noun_ndu
Noun_nga
Noun_ngal
Noun_nge
Noun_ngel
Noun_ngo
Noun_ngol
Noun_ngu
Noun_o
Noun_ɓe
Noun_ɗe
Noun_ɗi
Noun_koy
ClasslessNoun
Pronoun
Adjective
Adverb
Preposition
CoordConj
SubordConj
ConjAdverb
Numeral
Polarity
FunctionWord
Interjection

LEXICON VerbRoot
accugo:acc # to leave, leave off, let go
andinugo:andin # to inform, tell
andugo:and # to know
buutugo:buut # to be inexpensive
ɓadugi:ɓad
ɓalugo:ɓal
ɓedugo:ɓed
ɓurugo:ɓur
darugo:dar # to stand, stop
defugo:def
dillugo:dill # to go, to go away
doggugo:dogg
durugo:dur
ɗaanugo:ɗaan # to sleep
ɗuuɗugo:ɗuuɗ
eggugi:egg
ekkitugo:ekkit
faamugo:faam
faddugo:fadd
famɗugo:famɗ
fijugo:fij
filugo:fil
findinugo:findin
fuɗɗugo:fuɗɗ
haa
hasitugo:hasit
heɓugo:heɓ
heftugo:heft
heʼugo:heʼ
hirtugo:hirt
hofnugo:hofn
hokkugo:hokk
hollugo:holl
hootugo:hoot
hoynugo:hoyt
huɓɓugo:huɓɓ
huuwugo:huuw
jaabugo:jaab
jaɓugo:jaɓ
jaɓɓugo:jaɓɓ
jangugo:jang
jarribugo:jarrib
jinnugi:jinn
jippugo:jipp
jogugo:jog
joodʼugo:joodʼ # to sit, dwell, reside
juulugo:juul
laanyugo:laany
laarugo:laar
limugo:lim
lorugo:lor
lortugo:lort
luttugo:lutt
maɓɓugo:maɓɓ
maɓɓitugo:maɓɓit
marugo:mar
mawnugo:mawn
meeɗugo:meeɗ
meemugo:meem
mottugo:mott
naawugo:naaw
nanugo:nan
nastugo:nast
neeɓugo:neeɓ
nelugo:nel
noddugo:nodd
nyaamugo:nyaam # to eat
nyallugo:nyall
nyiɓugo:nyiɓ
ranwugo:ranw
remugo:rem
resugo:res
roondugo:roond # to carry (a load on head)
sappugo:sapp
silminugo:silmin
somugo:som
soodugo:sood # to buy
soofugo:soof
soorugo:soor
suɓtugo:suɓt
tammugo:tamm
tawugo:taw
teʼugo:teʼ
tiggugo:tigg
tiitugo:tiit
timmugo:timm
timminugo:timmin
tokkugo:tokk
ummugo:umm
unugo:un
usugo:us
ustugo:ust
waalugo:waal # to lie down, spend the night
waancugi:waanc
waawugo:waaw
waddugo:wadd
waɗugo:waɗ
wallugo:wall
warugo:war
wartugo:wart
waʼugo:waʼ
wayrugo:wayr
welugo:wel
windugo:wind # to buy
wiʼugo:wiʼ
woɗɗugo:woɗɗ
wolwugo:wol
wonugo:won
woodugo:wood
wooɗugo:wooɗ
woojugi:wooj
wurtugo:wurt
wuuw:wuuw
yaadugo:yaad
yaarugo:yaar
yahugo:yah
yamɗugo:yamɗ
yamɗitugo:yamɗit
yamugo:yam
yarugo:yar
yeccugo:yecc
yejjitugo:yejjit
yettugo:yett # to thank
yiɗugo:yiɗ
yiidugo:yiid
yillugo:yill
yiʼugo:yiʼ
yoorugo:yor
yottugo:yott
ƴamugo:yam # to ask

LEXICON VerbInfix
<ben>:an
<dst>:oy # far away
<caus>:in

LEXICON VerbInfl
<v><inf>:ugo
<v><inf>:go
<v><pprs>:a
<v><pprs><neg>:ataa
<v><past><pprs><neg>:ataano
<v><sta>:i
<v><sta><neg>:aaki
<v><past><sta><neg>:aakino
<v><pret>:i
<v><pret><neg>:aay
<v><pret><neg><o_sg1>:aayam
<v><pret><neg>:aa
<v><fut>:an
<v><fut>:ay
<v><fut><o_sg1>:at
<v><fut><o_sg1>:tam
<v><fut><o_sg2>:ete
<v><fut><o_sg2>:te
<v><fut><rel>:ata
<v><imp><sg>:u
<v><imp><sg>:
<v><imp><sg><o_sg1>:am
<v><imp><pl>:ee
<v><hab>:an
<v><hab>:ay
<v><sub>:a
<v><sub><o_sg2>:e

LEXICON Counterfactual
<cntfct>:no

LEXICON AuxiliaryRoot
daa<vaux><cntfct>:daa
ɗon<vaux>:ɗon
taa<vaux><neg>:taa

LEXICON AuxiliaryInfl
<past>:no

LEXICON Noun_ɗam
kosam<n><sg><cl_ɗam>:kosam
ndiyam<n><sg><cl_ɗam>:ndiyam
nyebbam<n><sg><cl_ɗam>:nyebbam

LEXICON Noun_ka
alluha<n><sg><cl_ka>:alluha
haala<n><sg><cl_ka>:haala
jiiba<n><sg><cl_ka>:jiiba
manda<n><sg><cl_ka>:manda
ngesa<n><sg><cl_ka>:ngesa
ngewta<n><sg><cl_ka>:ngewta
reeta<n><sg><cl_ka>:reeta

LEXICON Noun_ki
ɓokki<n><sg><cl_ki>:ɓokki
danki<n><sg><cl_ki>:danki
lekki<n><sg><cl_ki>:lekki

LEXICON Noun_ko
hottollo<n><sg><cl_ko>:hottollo
huɗo<n><sg><cl_ko>:huɗo

LEXICON Noun_nde
asaweere<n><sg><cl_nde>:asaweere
asira<n><sg><cl_nde>:asira
asiriire<n><sg><cl_nde>:asiriire
baalte<n><sg><cl_nde>:baalte
ɓernde<n><sg><cl_nde>:ɓernde
daande<n><sg><cl_nde>:daande
deftere<n><sg><cl_nde>:deftere
fayande<n><sg><cl_nde>:fayande
fijirde<n><sg><cl_nde>:fijirde
haɓɓere<n><sg><cl_nde>:haɓɓere
hinere<n><sg><cl_nde>:hinere
hitaande<n><sg><cl_nde>:hitaande
hoore<n><sg><cl_nde>:hoore
huɓɓirde<n><sg><cl_nde>:huɓɓirde
huunde<n><sg><cl_nde>:huunde
innde<n><sg><cl_nde>:innde
jangde<n><sg><cl_nde>:jangde
jangirde<n><sg><cl_nde>:jangirde
jemma<n><sg><cl_nde>:jemma
jokkere<n><sg><cl_nde>:jokkere
joonde<n><sg><cl_nde>:joonde
juulirde<n><sg><cl_nde>:jullirde
kiikiɗe<n><sg><cl_nde>:kiikiɗe
kobo<n><sg><cl_nde>:kobo
koboore<n><sg><cl_nde>:koboore
kondong<n><sg><cl_nde>:kondong
ladde<n><sg><cl_nde>:ladde
loonde<n><sg><cl_nde>:loonde
lootirde<n><sg><cl_nde>:lootirde
mangoro<n><sg><cl_nde>:mangoro
manoore<n><sg><cl_nde>:manoore
minti<n><sg><cl_nde>:minti
mintiire<n><sg><cl_nde>:mintiire
Nasaraare<n><sg><cl_nde>:Nasaraare
nonde<n><sg><cl_nde>:nonde
nyande<n><sg><cl_nde>:nyande
rowani<n><sg><cl_nde>:rowani
rowaniire<n><sg><cl_nde>:rowaniire
saare<n><sg><cl_nde>:saare
saʼinde<n><sg><cl_nde>:saʼinde
siwtaare<n><sg><cl_nde>:siwtaare
suley<n><sg><cl_nde>:suley
suleere<n><sg><cl_nde>:suleere
tingyeere<n><sg><cl_nde>:tingyeere
tumaatir<n><sg><cl_nde>:tumaatir
tumaatiire<n><sg><cl_nde>:tumaatiire
tummude<n><sg><cl_nde>:tummude
waalde<n><sg><cl_nde>:waalde
waflaare<n><sg><cl_nde>:waflaare
wakkati<n><sg><cl_nde>:wakkati
yiite<n><sg><cl_nde>:yiite
yiitere<n><sg><cl_nde>:yiitere
yonnde<n><sg><cl_nde>:yonnde

LEXICON Noun_ndi
comri<n><sg><cl_ndi>:comri
fajiri<n><sg><cl_ndi>:fajiri
gawri<n><sg><cl_ndi>:gawri
leddi<n><sg><cl_ndi>:leddi
lesdi<n><sg><cl_ndi>:lesdi
njamndi<n><sg><cl_ndi>:njamndi
nyiiri<n><sg><cl_ndi>:nyiiri

LEXICON Noun_ndu
akootiru<n><sg><cl_ndu>:akootiru
bukkaaru<n><sg><cl_ndu>:bukkaaru
ɓandu<n><sg><cl_ndu>:ɓandu
ɓoosaaru<n><sg><cl_ndu>:ɓoosaaru
duniyaaru<n><sg><cl_ndu>:duniyaaru
habaru<n><sg><cl_ndu>:habaru
koloba<n><sg><cl_ndu>:koloba
kolobaaru<n><sg><cl_ndu>:kolobaaru
lewru<n><sg><cl_ndu>:lewru
nofuru<n><sg><cl_ndu>:nofuru
nyamdu<n><sg><cl_ndu>:nyamdu
reedu<n><sg><cl_ndu>:reedu
sondu<n><sg><cl_ndu>:sondu
suudu<n><sg><cl_ndu>:suudu
unordu<n><sg><cl_ndu>:unordu
wawru<n><sg><cl_ndu>:wawru

LEXICON Noun_nga
agoogo<n><sg><cl_nga>:agoogo
agoogowa<n><sg><cl_nga>:agoogowa
aji<n><sg><cl_nga>:aji
ajiwa<n><sg><cl_nga>:ajiwa
asaana<n><sg><cl_nga>:asaana
baskur<n><sg><cl_nga>:baskur
baskurwa<n><sg><cl_nga>:baskurwa
footo<n><sg><cl_nga>:footo
goonga<n><sg><cl_nga>:goonga
kanti<n><sg><cl_nga>:kanti
kantiwa<n><sg><cl_nga>:kantiwa
mbaala<n><sg><cl_nga>:mbaala
mbeewa<n><sg><cl_nga>:mbeewa
moota<n><sg><cl_nga>:moota
ndabbawa<n><sg><cl_nga>:ndabbawa
saaʼa<n><sg><cl_nga>:saaʼa
taaga<n><sg><cl_nga>:taaga
tebur<n><sg><cl_nga>:tebur

LEXICON Noun_ngal
ballal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:ballal
dammugal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:dammugal
gertogal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:gertogal
jaawngal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:jaawngal
jigaawal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:jigaawal
koombowal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:koombowal
koroowal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:koroowal
kosngal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:kosngal
kuugal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:kuugal
leggal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:leggal
nelal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:nelal
piiroowal<n><sg><cl_ngal>:piiroowal

LEXICON Noun_nge
naange<n><sg><cl_nge>:naange
nagge<n><sg><cl_nge>:nagge

LEXICON Noun_ngel
baalel<n><sg><cl_ngel>:baalel
ɓingel<n><sg><cl_ngel>:ɓingel
gurel<n><sg><cl_ngel>:gurel
kusel<n><sg><cl_ngel>:kusel
pellel<n><sg><cl_ngel>:pellel

LEXICON Noun_ngo
ɓaawo<n><sg><cl_ngo>:ɓaawo
daago<n><sg><cl_ngo>:daago
gooro<n><sg><cl_ngo>:gooro
jungo<n><sg><cl_ngo>:jungo
leeso<n><sg><cl_ngo>:leeso
luumo<n><sg><cl_ngo>:luumo
maayo<n><sg><cl_ngo>:maayo
wuro<n><sg><cl_ngo>:wuro
yeeso<n><sg><cl_ngo>:yeeso

LEXICON Noun_ngol
bindirgol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:bindirgol
buulol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:buulol
dawrawol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:dawrawol
ɗereewol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:ɗereewol
koowaagol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:koowaagol
laawol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:laawol
loosol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:loosol
ngapaleewol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:ngapaleewol
ngeccawol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:ngeccawol
pataakewol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:pataakewol
peewol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:peewol
soorowol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:soorowol
taalol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:taalol
ƴamol<n><sg><cl_ngol>:ƴamol

LEXICON Noun_ngu
coggu<n><sg><cl_ngu>:coggu
jamanu<n><sg><cl_ngu>:jamanu
liingu<n><sg><cl_ngu>:liingu
mbeɗu<n><sg><cl_ngu>:mbeɗu
mbulku<n><sg><cl_ngu>:mbulku
ngabbu<n><sg><cl_ngu>:ngabbu
puccu<n><sg><cl_ngu>:puccu

LEXICON Noun_o
Amerikaajo<n><sg><cl_o>:Amerikaajo # American
baaba<n><sg><cl_o>:baaba # father
baabiraawo<n><sg><cl_o>:baabiraawo # father
bandiraawo<n><sg><cl_o>:bandiraawo # blood relative
biɗɗo<n><sg><cl_o>:biɗɗo # offspring, son, daughter
ɓii<n><sg><cl_o>:ɓii # offspring, son, daughter
daada<n><sg><cl_o>:daada # mother
daadiraawo<n><sg><cl_o>:daadiraawo # mother
debbo<n><sg><cl_o>:debbo # woman, wife
dewerɗiraawo<n><sg><cl_o>:dewerɗiraawo # sibling, brother, sister
ɗumeejo<n><sg><cl_o>:ɗumeejo # what nationality
esiraawo<n><sg><cl_o>:esiraawo # in-law
goɗɗo<n><sg><cl_o>:goɗɗo # someone
gorko<n><sg><cl_o>:gorko # man, husband
Hawsaajo<n><sg><cl_o>:Hawsaajo # Hausa person
jawmu<n><sg><cl_o>:jawmu # owner, master
koɗo<n><sg><cl_o>:koɗo # stranger, guest, visitor
laamiiɗo<n><sg><cl_o>:laamiiɗo # king, emir
maamiraawo<n><sg><cl_o>:maamiraawo # grandparent, grandfather, grandmother
mallumjo<n><sg><cl_o>:mallumjo # teacher
mawɗo<n><sg><cl_o>:mawɗo # a big one, adult
mawniraawo<n><sg><cl_o>:mawniraawo # older sibling
minyiraawo<n><sg><cl_o>:minyiraawo # younger sibling
modibbo<n><sg><cl_o>:modibbo # learned person, teacher
moyjo<n><sg><cl_o>:moyjo # what type of person
nawliraawo<n><sg><cl_o>:nawliraawo # co-wife
nayeejo<n><sg><cl_o>:nayeejo # old man
ndottiijo<n><sg><cl_o>:ndottiijo # respected man
neɗɗo<n><sg><cl_o>:neɗɗo # person
pukaraajo<n><sg><cl_o>:pukaraajo # student
Pullo<n><sg><cl_o>:Pullo # Fulani
soobaajo<n><sg><cl_o>:soobaajo # friend
taaniraawo<n><sg><cl_o>:taaniraawo # grandchild
tiniiɗo<n><sg><cl_o>:tiniiɗo # zealous peerson
Tuurankeejo<n><sg><cl_o>:Tuurankeejo # European, English person
